Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
A person that wants to construct, alter, relocate, maintain or repair a wa-
ter, gas, electric or communication service line, fixture or other facility within the right  of
way of a public road under the jurisdiction of a county shall be responsible for applying for
any permit and  paying any permit fee that the county governing body requires pursuant to
section 2 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 2.
(1) A county  governing body may require a permit for the construction, al-
teration, relocation, maintenance or repair of a water, gas, electric or communication  ser-
vice line, fixture or other facility within the right of  way of a public road under the
jurisdiction of the county.
(2) A county shall issue or  deny a permit described in subsection (1) of this section that
the county governing body requires within  15 business days after a complete application for
the permit is filed with the county. The requirement under  this subsection does not apply
to an application for a permit for relocation of a line, fixture or other facility when the re-
location is required by the county.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 758.010 (1) and except as provided in subsection  (4) of this sec-
tion, a county governing body  may charge a fee, as described in subsection (5) of this section,
for the administration  and issuance of a permit described in subsection (1) of this section
that the county governing body requires.
(4) A county governing body may not charge a fee for  a permit described in subsection
(1) of this section that the county governing body requires if:
(a) The permit is for vegetation  management or vegetation clearance maintenance, and
the vegetation management or vegetation clearance maintenance  is required by the Public
Utility Commission under ORS  757.035 or 757.039 or by a national electric safety code
adopted, by rule, by the commission;
(b) The permit is for:
(A) Routine replacement or maintenance of a line,  fixture or other facility, including but
not limited to pole replacement; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1566 (SB 1566-A) Page 1
(B) Replacement or maintenance of a line,  fixture or other facility required by the com-
mission under ORS 757.035 or 757.039 or by a national electric safety  code adopted, by rule,
by the commission;
(c) The  permit is for maintenance of a line, fixture or other facility related to a water
system, including a pumping facility, air relief valve, pressure valve or fire hydrant,  and the
maintenance is essential for the safe operation of the water system;
(d) The permit is for relocation of a line,  fixture or other facility, and the relocation is
required by the county; or
(e)(A) The permit is for emergency or urgent  work, regardless of the duration of time
of the work, to restore or maintain services, and the emergency or  urgent work is necessary
to protect public health or safety. A county may not delay emergency or  urgent work under
this paragraph to process an application for a permit under this section.
(B) As used in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, “emergency or urgent work” includes
work required as a result of an accident or casualty, fire, flood, drought, wind or other na-
tural elements, court order or litigation, breakdown of or damage to a facility,  act of God,
act of a civil, military or government authority, or act or omission of a third party.
(5)(a) Subject to paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, the maximum fee amount that
a county governing  body may charge for the administration and issuance of a permit de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section that the county governing body requires is $500.
(b)(A) The maximum fee amount described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection shall be
increased annually on July 1 by the lesser of:
(i) The percentage increase, if any,  in the cost of living for the previous calendar year,
based on changes in the Consumer  Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region (All
Items),  as  published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of
Labor; or
(ii) Five percent.
(B) An amount determined under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph  shall be rounded
up to the nearest dollar.
(c) The fee amount charged by a county governing body may  be no greater than neces-
sary to cover, and may  be used only to cover, the costs incurred by the county for the ad-
ministration, issuance and compliance enforcement of  the permits described in subsection
(1) of this section that the county governing body requires.
(d) Any fee charged by a county governing body for  a permit described in subsection (1)
of this section that  a county governing body requires must be carried out on a competitively
neutral and nondiscriminatory basis.
(6) To exercise a power provided under this section, a county governing  body shall first
authorize the exercise of that power by county ordinance.
(7) Nothing in this section reduces the authority of a  county governing body provided
under ORS 368.036, 758.010 (2) or 758.025.
(8) Nothing in this section may be construed to allow a county  governing body to assess
a franchise fee or privilege tax for the right or privilege to  occupy or otherwise use, con-
struct, alter, relocate, maintain or repair a water, gas,  electric or communication service
line, fixture or  other facility within the right of way of a public road under the jurisdiction
of the county.
SECTION 3.
(1) Section 2 of this 2024 Act does not  prohibit a county governing body from
entering into a franchise agreement, agreement pursuant to ORS 190.010 or  other agreement
that governs the terms and conditions by  which a person may construct, alter, relocate,
maintain or repair a water, gas, electric or communication  service line, fixture or other fa-
cility within the right of way of a public road under the jurisdiction of the county.
(2) A county governing body may not require a person to apply or pay a  fee for a permit
described in section 2 (1) of this 2024 Act that the county  governing body requires, if a
franchise agreement, agreement pursuant to  ORS 190.010 or other agreement governs the
Enrolled Senate Bill 1566 (SB 1566-A) Page 2
terms and conditions by which the person may construct, alter, relocate,  maintain or repair
the water, gas, electric or communication service line, fixture or other facility.
SECTION 4. (1) Sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act become operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) A county governing body may take any action before  the operative date specified in
subsection (1)  of this section that is necessary to enable the county governing body and
county to exercise, on and  after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,
the powers of the county governing body and county under sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 5. Sections 1 to 3 of this 2024 Act are repealed on January 2, 2031.
SECTION 6. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 28, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1566 (SB 1566-A) Page 3